Illinois, session 104th, SB925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Probation Challenge Program Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 120/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1501)7    Sec. 1. This Article shall be known as the the Probation 8Challenge Program Act. 9(Source: P.A. 84-1426.)